test/src/morphology/V-solleed_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - solleed: # Verb 'to open' - full paradigm
     solleed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sollääm
     solleed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: sollääk
     solleed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sollad
     solleed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: solleep
     solleed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: sollveˊted
     solleed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: sollee 
     solleed+V+Ind+Prs+4: solleet

     solleed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: solleem
     solleed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: solliiǩ
     solleed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sollii
     solleed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [solliim, solliin]
     solleed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: solliid
     solleed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: sollee
     solleed+V+Ind+Prt+4: solleeš

     solleed+V+Pot+Sg1: solleˊžem
     solleed+V+Pot+Sg2: solleˊžiǩ
     solleed+V+Pot+Sg3: solleež
     solleed+V+Pot+Pl1: [solleˊžep, solleˊžim]
     solleed+V+Pot+Pl2: solleˊžid 
     solleed+V+Pot+Pl3: solleˊže
     solleed+V+Pot+4: solleˊžet
     solleed+V+Pot+ConNeg: solleˊže

     solleed+V+Cond+Sg1: solleˊčem
     solleed+V+Cond+Sg2: solleˊčiǩ
     solleed+V+Cond+Sg3: solleˊči
     solleed+V+Cond+Pl1: [solleˊčim, solleˊčep]
     solleed+V+Cond+Pl2: solleˊčid
     solleed+V+Cond+Pl3: solleˊče
     solleed+V+Cond+4: solleˊčeš
     solleed+V+Cond+ConNeg: solleˊče

     solleed+V+Imp+Sg2: sollad
     solleed+V+Imp+Sg3: sollââǥǥas
     solleed+V+Imp+Pl1: sollâkap
     solleed+V+Imp+Pl2: solleˊǩed
     solleed+V+Imp+Pl3: sollâkaz
     solleed+V+Imp+ConNeg: sollukku

     solleed+V+ActEss: solleˊmen
     solleed+V+Action: solleem
     solleed+V+PrsPrc: solleei
     solleed+V+PrfPrc: sollääm
     solleed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [sollummu, solluum]
     solleed+V+VAbess: solleǩâni
     solleed+V+GerTemp: solleen
     solleed+V+GerInstr: solleeˊl
